Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 8 Governor’s Committee on Mental Retardation

40.1-8-1.
Creation — Members.

There is hereby created a fourteen (14) member permanent committee to be known as the “Governor’s Committee on Mental Retardation,” hereinafter referred to as “the committee”:

Six (6) of whom shall be representatives of non-governmental organizations or groups concerned with education, employment, rehabilitation, welfare, and health, to be appointed by the governor;

Six (6) of whom shall be representatives of consumers who are mentally retarded, of this group, three (3) of whom shall be selected from a list of nominees submitted by the RI ARC, to be appointed by the governor;

One of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker;

And one of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate.

The assistant director for developmental disabilities within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall serve as an ex officio member but shall not be eligible to vote.

No employee of any state agency or institution engaged in the care or training of persons who are mentally retarded shall be eligible for appointment to the committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 108; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 8; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 108; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 90; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 29.

40.1-8-2.
Terms of appointment.

Of the nonlegislative members appointed originally under this chapter, one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of one year; one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. The two (2) legislative members shall serve for the length of their current elected term in office and reappointment or replacement shall be for like terms. Thereafter, vacancies created by the expiration of terms shall be filled with appointments for terms of three (3) years. Members whose terms expire may be reappointed to succeed themselves.

Vacancies occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which appointed shall be filled by appointment in like manner for the remainder of the term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 368, § 1.

40.1-8-3.
Appointment of officers and employees — Rules — Meetings.

The governor shall designate one member of the committee to serve as its chairperson during the governor’s term of office or until he or she appoints another member of the committee to serve in that capacity. The committee shall elect annually, from among its members, a vice chairperson, who shall serve as such until a successor is elected and who is authorized to act as chairperson pro tempore of the committee during the absence of the chairperson or should there be a vacancy for any cause in the office of the chairperson. The committee shall appoint an executive secretary to serve as executive officer and secretary of the committee. The executive secretary may be the employee of another agency of state government, appointed to serve as executive secretary of the committee, with the consent of the executive office of the secretary’s own agency.

The committee may appoint such other personnel as may be necessary for the efficient performance of the duties prescribed by this chapter.

The committee shall make rules for the conduct of its affairs, and shall meet at least bimonthly, and at other times upon the call of the chair or the written request of any two (2) members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 368, § 1.

40.1-8-4.
Compensation and expenses of committee.

The members of the committee shall receive no compensation for their services as committee members, but may, at the discretion of the governor, be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses actually incurred in the performance of their official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 368, § 1.

40.1-8-5.
Purpose of committee.

It shall be the duty of the committee to work in cooperation with the President’s Committee for People with Intellectual Disabilities and such other interested federal and state agencies, private organizations, and community groups in promoting the amelioration of mental retardation through the utilization of whatever community and state resources the committee may deem necessary to accomplish this.

The committee shall consider and advise the governor, through the office of mental retardation, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, on such mental retardation legislation and other retardation matters as its members, the governor, the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and the assistant director for mental retardation may request; including, but not being limited to, advising and consulting with the office of mental retardation concerning improving the care, rehabilitation, and the training of mentally retarded persons, purchase of facilities, plans for construction of mental retardation facilities and the administration of programs and facilities (private and public) which receive state funds for the purpose of ameliorating mental retardation and/or otherwise providing services for mentally retarded persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 368, § 1.

40.1-8-6.
Authority to receive gifts.

The committee is authorized to receive any gifts, grants, or donations made for any of the purposes of its program, and to disburse and administer the same in accordance with the terms thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 368, § 1.